California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
County boards of supervisors may set fees for registration to cover the cost of registering pest control aircraft pilots but in no case shall such fee total more than ten dollars ($10) per year for a pilot who registers in person in the county in which he intends to work, and five dollars ($5) per year for a pilot already registered in another county and who is now registering in an additional county as provided in Section 11921.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 732.)
-------------------------------------------

11924.

A pest control aircraft pilot registration may be refused, revoked, or suspended by the agricultural commissioner for the reasons indicated in Section 11910 for the refusal, revocation, or suspension of a pest control aircraft pilot certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 732.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Financial Responsibility [11931. - 11940.]

11931.

As used in this article:

(a) “Judgment” means a final judgment of any court of competent jurisdiction in this or any other state, or of the United States, against a person as defendant upon a cause of action which arises out of any pest control operation.

(b) “Operator” means any person that is required to be licensed pursuant to this division who is authorized to apply any pest control material or substance by dusting, spraying, or any other manner whereby such material or substance is applied through the medium of aircraft.

(c) “Pest control operation” means the application of any pest control material or substance by an operator.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11932.

For the purposes of this article:

(a) A judgment is satisfied when twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) has been credited upon any judgment in excess of that amount which arises out of any one accident or occurrence.

(b) A deposit of bond or other obligation for the payment of which the full faith and credit of the United States or of this state is pledged is considered a deposit of money.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11933.

The director shall suspend the license of any operator upon receiving a copy of a judgment and a certificate of facts relative to such judgment, upon a form that is provided by the director, which indicate that the operator has not for a period of 30 days satisfied a final judgment rendered against him.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11934.

The suspension shall remain in effect and no license shall be issued to the operator unless and until the judgment is satisfied, or the operator submits to the director proof of his financial ability to respond in damages pursuant to the judgment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11935.

Proof of such financial responsibility may be made by furnishing security in an amount not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). The security may consist of any of the following:

(a) A surety bond in favor of any person that may suffer damage by reason of any pest control operation by the operator which is executed by an admitted surety insurer.

(b) An insurance policy which insures the operator against liability for damages pursuant to the judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 233.)
-------------------------------------------

11936.

If the security which is required by Section 11934 is diminished in amount by reason of any recovery against it, the security shall be replenished so that it amounts to not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11937.

Upon the expiration of 30 days after any judgment becomes final, which is not stayed or satisfied in any action which results in a judgment for damages, the clerk of a court shall forward to the director a certified copy of the judgment or a certified copy of the register of actions, and a certificate of facts relative to the judgment, on a form which is provided by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 44, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11938.

Any person whose license has been suspended, is about to be suspended, or becomes subject to suspension pursuant to this article, may relieve himself from the suspension by filing with the director an affidavit which states all of following:

(a) That at the time of the incident upon which the judgment was rendered he was insured.

(b) That the insurer is liable to pay the judgment.

(c) The reason, if known, why the insurance company has not paid the judgment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11939.

The person that files the affidavit pursuant to Section 11938 shall also file the original policy of insurance or a certified copy of the policy, if available, and such other documents as the director may require to show that the loss, injury, or damage for which the judgment was rendered, was covered by the policy of insurance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11940.

If the director is satisfied from the papers which are filed pursuant to Sections 11938 and 11939 that the insurer was authorized to issue the policy of insurance in this state at the time of issuing the policy and that the insurer is liable to pay the judgment, at least to the extent and for the amounts which are provided in this article, the director shall not suspend the license or, if the license has already been suspended, he shall reinstate it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Agricultural Pest Control Advisers [12001. - 12054.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [12001. - 12005.]

12001.

No person shall act, or offer to act, as an agricultural pest control adviser without first having secured an agricultural pest control adviser license from the director. Officials of federal, state, and county departments of agriculture and the University of California personnel engaged in official duties relating to agricultural use are exempt from this section if any recommendation by any of these persons as to a specific application on a specific parcel is made in writing. Officials of districts formed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 5780) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code are exempt from this section until July 1, 1995, if any recommendation by any of these persons as to a specific application on a specific parcel is in writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 216, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.

No person shall act, or offer to act, as an agricultural pest control adviser in any county wherein he makes any recommendation for agricultural use without first registering with the county agricultural commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 901.)
-------------------------------------------

12003.

Agricultural pest control advisers shall put all recommendations concerning any agricultural use in writing. One copy of each such written recommendation shall be signed and dated and shall be furnished to the operator of the property prior to the application. Where a pesticide use is recommended a copy shall also be furnished to the dealer and the applicator prior to the application.

Each written recommendation shall include, when applicable, the following:

(a) The name and dosage of each pesticide to be used or description of method recommended.

(b) The identity of each pest to be controlled.

(c) The owner or operator, location of and acreage to be treated.

(d) The commodity, crop, or site to be treated.

(e) The suggested schedule, time, or conditions for the pesticide application or other control method.

(f) A warning of the possibility of damages by the pesticide application that reasonably should have been known by the agricultural pest control adviser to exist.

(g) The signature and address of the person making the recommendation, the date, and the name of the business such person represents.

(h) Any other information the director may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1118, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12004.

Agricultural pest control advisers and agricultural pest control operators shall retain one copy of each written recommendation for one year following the date of such recommendation. A copy of a recommendation shall be immediately furnished to the agricultural commissioner upon his request.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1276.)
-------------------------------------------

12005.

The director may adopt such rules and regulations in order to carry out the provisions of this chapter as are reasonably necessary to effectuate the purposes of this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1276.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Licensing [12021. - 12024.]

12021.

An application for an agricultural pest control adviser license shall be in the form prescribed by the director. Each application shall state the name and address of the applicant specified on the application and any other information required by the director. The application shall be accompanied by a fee as prescribed by the director pursuant to Section 11502.5 to be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund. All licenses issued under this article shall expire on December 31 of the last year for which they are issued. Licenses may be renewed before their expiration through application in the form prescribed by the director and upon payment of a fee as prescribed by the director
 pursuant to Section 11502.5. A penalty as prescribed by the director pursuant to Section 11502.5 shall be assessed against any applicant who applies for a renewal of the license after the expiration date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 8.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.

Applicants for licensing shall elect to be examined for certification in one or more of the following categories:

(a) Control of insects, mites, and other invertebrates.

(b) Control of plant pathogens.

(c) Control of nematodes.

(d) Control of vertebrate pests.

(e) Control of weeds.

(f) Defoliation.

(g) Plant growth regulation.

The examination shall be prepared and administered by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1276.)
-------------------------------------------

12023.

An agricultural pest control adviser license may be refused or may be revoked or suspended by the director as necessary to carry out the purposes of this division. Cause for refusal, revocation, or suspension shall include, but shall not be limited to the following:

(a) Failure to put a recommendation in writing.

(b) The making of false or fraudulent statements in any written recommendation.

(c) Failure or refusal to comply with any provision of this chapter, or any other regulation adopted by the agricultural commissioner.

(d) Failure or refusal to comply with any provisions of this division or of Division 7 (commencing with Section 12501) relating to pesticides or regulation of the department adopted pursuant to such provisions.

(e) Failure to qualify by examination in at least one of the categories in Section 12022.

(f) Unprofessional conduct, as defined in Section 12023.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------

12023.5.

In addition to any other provision of this code, unprofessional conduct shall constitute a basis for refusal, revocation, or suspension of an agricultural pest control license. “Unprofessional conduct” means either of the following:

(a) Repeated acts of recommending the clearly excessive use of a pesticide or any method or device for the control of plant, animal, or other pests.

(b) Repeated acts of recommending the use of an ineffective pesticide or any ineffective method or device for the control of plant, animal, or any other pests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------

12024.

The director by regulation shall establish the minimum requirement for pest control adviser by education, experience, and examination to carry out the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Registration [12031. - 12035.]

12031.

Each agricultural pest control adviser who makes any recommendation for agricultural use shall register in person with the agricultural commissioner in the county listed in the adviser’s address on the license issued pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 12021) or with the director if the county does not have an agricultural commissioner. If the address of the adviser on the state license is not within this state, the registration shall be in the county of occupational choice. Registration in any additional county shall be made by mail or in person, at the discretion of the commissioner of the additional county. The additional registration by mail shall be made on prescribed forms which may be obtained and processed in the county listed in the address of the adviser on the state license or the county of occupational choice, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 95, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12033.

Registration shall be renewed annually by all agricultural pest control advisers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1276.)
-------------------------------------------

12034.

County boards of supervisors may set fees for registration to cover the cost of registering pest control advisers, but in no case shall the fee total more than ten dollars ($10) per year for a pest control adviser to register in person in the county listed in the adviser’s address on the license issued pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 12021) or the county of occupational choice, as the case may be, and five dollars ($5) per year for an adviser to register in an additional county as provided in Section 12031.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 95, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12035.

A pest control adviser registration may be refused, revoked, or suspended by the agricultural commissioner. Cause for such refusal, revocation, or suspension may be for the same reasons prescribed in Section 12023 for the refusal, revocation, or suspension for a pest control adviser license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1276.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Agricultural Pest Control Advisory Committee [12041. - 12047.]

12041.

The Agricultural Pest Control Advisory Committee, which was established by Chapter 1276 of the Statutes of 1971, is hereby abolished.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 459, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12042.

There is in the department an Agricultural Pest Control Advisory Committee, appointed by the secretary or director, consisting of the following members:

(a) One member representing agricultural pest control advisers.

(b) One member representing agricultural pest control businesses.

(c) One member representing pest control maintenance gardeners.

(d) One member representing pest control aircraft pilots.

(e) One member representing pesticide dealers.

(f) One member representing commercial applicator certificate holders.

(g) One member representing registrants, as defined in Section 12755.

(h) One member representing the California Agricultural Commissioners and Sealers Association.

(i) One member representing the University of California, Division of Agriculture and Natural Resources, who is nominated by the board of regents and who specializes in pest management.

(j) One member representing the Board of Trustees of the California State University system.

(k) One member representing the Board of Governors of the California Community College system.

(l) One member representing producers, as defined in Section 56110.

(m) One member representing the general public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 460, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

12043.

The public member shall be appointed to the committee by the director from nominees recommended by the committee. The public member shall represent the interests of the general public in all matters coming before the committee and shall have the same voting and other rights and immunities as other members of the committee.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 459, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12044.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that members appointed to the Agricultural Pest Control Advisory Committee pursuant to this article are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry concerned, and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are appointed to the committee, the particular agricultural industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 459, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12045.

Except as provided in Section 12046, the term of office of the members of the committee is three years. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 459, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12046.

Initial appointments to the committee shall be made as follows:

(a) Representatives for the public, the California Community College system, the State University system, and the pest control maintenance gardeners shall be appointed for one year.

(b) Representatives for pest control aircraft pilots, commercial applicator certificate holders, pesticide dealers, registrants as defined in Section 12755, and the California Agricultural Commissioners and Sealers Association shall be appointed for two years.

(c) Representatives for agricultural pest control advisers, agricultural pest control businesses, the University of California Extension Service, and producers shall be appointed for three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 460, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

12047.

The committee shall be advisory to the director in all matters concerning the licensing, certification, and regulation of persons and firms licensed or certified pursuant to this division, and shall meet on the call of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 459, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Violations [12051. - 12054.]

12051.

It is unlawful for any person to act or offer to act as an agricultural pest control adviser without first having secured an agricultural pest control adviser’s license from the director in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1276.)
-------------------------------------------

12052.

It is unlawful for any person to act or offer to act as an agricultural pest control adviser in any county wherein the adviser makes any recommendation for agricultural use without first registering with the county agricultural commissioner of that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 95, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12053.

It is unlawful to violate any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation issued thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1276.)
-------------------------------------------

12054.

It shall be unlawful for any pest control adviser to make recommendations in a category for which he is not certified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1276.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Pest Control Dealer [12101. - 12121.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [12101. - 12116.]

12101.

No person shall act in the capacity of a pest control dealer or shall engage or offer to engage in the business of, advertise as, or assume to act as a pest control dealer unless he or she is licensed as a pest control dealer pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 620, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12101.5.

Each pest control dealer required to be licensed pursuant to Section 12101 shall have and maintain, at the principal office, and at each branch location, a designated agent qualified to actively supervise all operations conducted at that location. The designated agent shall be a person who holds a pest control dealer designated agent license, an agricultural pest control adviser license, a pest control aircraft pilot certificate, or a qualified applicator license issued pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 12201).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 620, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12102.

The provisions of Section 12101 shall not apply to any federal, state, or county agency which provides pesticide materials for agricultural use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1414.)
-------------------------------------------

12103.

(a) An application for a license shall be in the form prescribed by the director. Each application shall state the name and address of the applicant specified on the application and any other information required by the director. The application shall be accompanied by a fee as prescribed by the director pursuant to Section 11502.5 to be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund. All licenses issued under this article shall expire on December 31 of the last year for which they are issued.

(b) To the amount of the license fee shall be added an additional fee, in an amount prescribed by the director pursuant
 to Section 11502.5, for each branch salesyard, store, or sales location that is owned and operated by the applicant in this state or in other states when doing business from that out-of-state location regarding pesticides to be sold or delivered into or within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 9.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12104.

The license for a pest control dealer may be renewed before its expiration through application in the form prescribed by the director, accompanied by a fee as prescribed by the director pursuant to Section 11502.5, for each license and for each branch salesyard, store, or sales location that does business in the state, or that does business in this state from an out-of-state location as specified in Section
 12103. These fees shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 10.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12105.

A penalty as prescribed by the director pursuant to Section 11502.5 shall be added to any fee that is not paid by the date of expiration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 56.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12106.

Each applicant shall satisfy the director as to his or her knowledge of the laws and regulations governing the use and sale of pesticides, and his or her responsibility in carrying on the business of a pest control dealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 620, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12107.

The director shall issue to each applicant that satisfies the requirements of this article a license that entitles the applicant to conduct the business described in the application for the calendar years for which the license is issued, unless the license is sooner revoked or suspended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 11.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12108.

Every licensed pest control dealer who changes his or her address or place of business shall immediately notify the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 620, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12110.

Each dealer shall be responsible for the acts of each person employed by him in the solicitation and sale of pesticides and all claims and recommendations for use of pesticides. The dealer’s license shall be subject to disciplinary action for any violation of this chapter whether committed by the dealer, or by any officer, agent or employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1414.)
-------------------------------------------

12111.

The director may adopt such rules and regulations as are reasonably necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1414.)
-------------------------------------------

12113.

The director may, after a hearing, refuse, revoke, or suspend a pest control dealer license for violation of the provisions of this division or Division 7 (commencing with Section 12501) relating to pesticides or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 620, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12114.

(a) Each licensed pest control dealer, and each person who is required to be licensed as a pest control dealer pursuant to Section 12101, shall maintain at their principal place of business the records of its purchases, sales, and distributions of pesticides into or within this state, including those of its branch locations, for four years. Each dealer shall also maintain the pesticide broker or pest control dealer license number of any pesticide broker or pest control dealer from whom the dealer purchased pesticides registered by the director and labeled for agricultural use. The records shall be available for audit by the director.

(b) Each licensed
 pest control dealer, and each person who is required to be licensed as a pest control dealer pursuant to Section 12101, shall report quarterly to the director the total dollars of sales and total pounds or gallons sold into or within this state of each pesticide subject to Sections 12841 and 12841.1. The quarterly report shall be in the form prescribed by the director and shall include information from the dealer’s licensed branch locations, if any, and any other information specified on the form or required by the director. The report shall include a certification, under penalty of perjury, that the information contained in the report is true and correct. The report shall accompany payment of assessments required by Sections 12841 and 12841.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 60, Sec. 7.   (AB 2113)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12115.

Any licensed pest control dealer, or any person who is required to be licensed as a pest control dealer pursuant to Section 12101, who purchases pesticide products that are registered by the director pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12751) of Division 7 and labeled for agricultural use from a person other than a registrant or a licensed pest control dealer, shall report in writing the name, address, telephone number, and pesticide broker license number issued by the director, if any, of those persons to the director annually, by December 1 each year.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12115.5 by Stats. 1997, Ch. 695, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12116.

It is unlawful for a licensed pest control dealer to purchase for sale in this state a pesticide that is labeled for agricultural use except from a registrant, a pest control dealer licensed pursuant to Section 12107, or a pesticide broker licensed pursuant to Section 12402.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12115.6 by Stats. 1997, Ch. 695, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Violations [12121. - 12121.]

12121.

It is unlawful for any person who is subject to this chapter to do any of the following:

(a) Fail to demonstrate to the director qualifications to act in the capacity of a pest control dealer.

(b) Fail to notify the director of any transfer or change of address.

(c) Fail to comply with the provisions of this division or Division 7 (commencing with Section 12501) relating to pesticides or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions.

(d) Make false or fraudulent statements, or misrepresent or fail to disclose any material fact in making application for a license or renewal of license.

(e) Make any false or misleading statements or promises of a character likely to influence, induce, or deceive, or publish, or cause to be published, or distributed or displayed any false or misleading literature or advertisement, concerning any pesticide or method of pest control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 620, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Qualified Applicator License [12201. - 12206.]

12201.

An application for a qualified applicator license shall be in a form prescribed by the director. Each application shall state the name and address of the applicant specified on the application and any other information required by the director. The application shall be accompanied by a fee as prescribed by the director pursuant to Section 11502.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.1.

It is unlawful for any person to act in a supervisory capacity or position for a pest control business, except a business licensed only in the maintenance gardener category pursuant to Section 11705, unless the person has a qualified applicator license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 624, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12202.

(a) All licenses issued pursuant to this chapter expire on December 31 of the last year for which they are issued. Licenses may be renewed before their expiration through application in the form prescribed by the director and upon payment of a fee as prescribed by the director pursuant to Section 11502.5.

(b) A penalty as prescribed by the director pursuant to Section 11502.5 shall be assessed against any applicant who applies for renewal after the expiration date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 12.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12203.

Applicants shall be examined on the requirements of laws and regulations concerning pesticide use and shall elect to be examined for licensing in one or more of the categories established by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 13.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12203.1.

The director may designate subcategories within the categories established pursuant to Section 12203, as determined to be necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 14.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12204.

The director shall issue to each applicant who satisfies the requirements of this chapter a qualified applicator license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 503, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

12205.

A qualified applicator license may be refused, revoked, or suspended by the director, after a hearing, for any of the following:

(a) Failure to comply with this division or Division 7 (commencing with Section 12501) or regulations adopted pursuant to these divisions.

(b) Making any false or fraudulent record or report.

(c) Failure to ensure that the responsibilities of the pest control business specified in regulations are carried out.

(d) Failure to supervise operations, activities, and employees of the pest control business in a manner that ensures compliance with this division and Division 7 (commencing with Section 12501) pertaining to pesticides.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 624, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12206.

Notwithstanding Section 12205, if the director finds on the basis of affidavits submitted to the director by the enforcement personnel specified in Section 11501.5, or by injured parties, that continuance of the license endangers public welfare or safety, the director may, pending a hearing, suspend or place conditions on the license of any qualified applicator. The director may terminate the suspension of, or any condition placed upon, a license upon the taking of corrective action by the qualified applicator that the director determines satisfactory to assure compliance with statutes and regulations. In that event, the matter may proceed to hearing as though the license had not been suspended or the conditions placed upon it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 624, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Pesticide Dealer Designated Agent [12251. - 12258.]

12251.

No person shall act as a designated agent of a pest control dealer who is licensed pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 12101), unless that person is licensed as a pest control dealer designated agent pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 620, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12252.

(a) An application for a pest control dealer designated agent license shall be in the form prescribed by the director. Each application shall state the name and address of the applicant specified on the application and any other information required by the director. The application shall be accompanied by a fee as prescribed by the director pursuant to Section 11502.5.

(b) All licenses issued pursuant to this chapter shall expire on December 31 of the last year for which they are issued.

(c) Licenses may be renewed before their expiration through application in the form prescribed by the director
 and upon payment of a fee as prescribed by the director pursuant to Section 11502.5. A penalty as prescribed by the director pursuant to Section 11502.5 shall be added to any license renewal fee that is not paid by the date of expiration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 15.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12253.

Before initial license is issued, the applicant shall pass an examination to demonstrate to the director the applicant’s knowledge of the laws and regulations governing the use and sale of pesticides and the responsibility in carrying on the business of a pest control dealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 620, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12254.

The director shall issue to each applicant who satisfies the requirements of this chapter a pest control dealer designated agent license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 620, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12255.

Every licensed pest control dealer designated agent who changes his or her address shall immediately notify the director of the new address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 620, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12256.

The director may adopt rules and regulations that are reasonably necessary to effectuate this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 791, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12257.

The director may, after a hearing, refuse, revoke, or suspend a pest control dealer designated agent license for violation of this chapter or Division 7 (commencing with Section 12501). The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 620, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12258.

It is unlawful for any person who is subject to this chapter to do any of the following:

(a) Fail to notify the director of any change of address.

(b) Fail to comply with the provisions of this division or Division 7 (commencing with Section 12501) relating to pesticides or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions.

(c) Make false or fraudulent statements, or misrepresent or fail to disclose any material fact in making an application for a license or renewal of a license.

(d) Make any false or misleading statements in any written record or report relating to pesticides or involving the pest control dealer business where that person is, or was, employed.

(e) Fail to supervise employees actively in the use and sale of pesticides and exercise responsibility in carrying on the business of a pest control dealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 435, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Pesticide Brokers [12400. - 12408.]

12400.

It is unlawful for any person, other than the registrant or pest control dealer licensed pursuant to Section 12107, to sell, offer to sell, or distribute into this state, or bring into the state for sale, any pesticide products that have been registered by the director unless the person is licensed by the director as a pesticide broker.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 612, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.

An application for a pesticide broker license, or renewal of a license, shall be in the form prescribed by the director. Each application for a license, or license renewal, shall state the name and address of the applicant, and any other information specified on the application or required by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 612, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12402.

The director shall issue to each applicant that satisfies the requirements of this chapter a pesticide broker license that entitles the applicant to conduct the business described in the application for the calendar years for which the license is issued unless the license is revoked or suspended in the interim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 16.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12403.

All licenses issued pursuant to this chapter may be renewed before their expiration through application to the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 17.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12405.

Each licensed pesticide broker that changes the address of its place of business, or that of a branch location, shall immediately provide the director written notification of the change.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 695, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12406.
